Wyoming statutes. Title 12 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 1 General Provisions

§ 12-1-101.
Definitions.

As used in this title:

“Alcoholic liquor” means any spirituous or fermented fluid, substance or compound other than malt beverage intended for beverage purposes which contains at least one-half of one percent (.5%) of alcohol by volume. As used in this paragraph, “beverage” does not include liquid filled candies containing less than six and one-quarter percent (6.25%) of alcohol by volume;

“Building” means a roofed and walled structure built or set in place for permanent use;

“Club” means any of the following organizations:

A post, charter, camp or other local unit composed only of veterans and its duly organized auxiliary, chartered by the Congress of the United States for patriotic, fraternal or benevolent purposes and, as the owner, lessee or occupant, operates an establishment for these purposes within the state;

A chapter, lodge or other local unit of an American national fraternal organization and, as the owner, lessee or occupant, operates an establishment for fraternal purposes within the state. As used in this subparagraph, an American fraternal organization means an organization actively operating in not less than thirty-six (36) states or having been in active continuous existence for not less than twenty (20) years, but does not mean a college fraternity;

A hall or building association of a local unit specified in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph, of which all of the capital stock is owned by the local unit or its members, operating clubroom facilities for the local unit;

A golf club having more than fifty (50) bona fide members and owning, maintaining or operating a bona fide golf course together with a clubhouse;

A social club with more than one hundred (100) bona fide members who are residents of the county in which it is located, owning, maintaining or operating club quarters, incorporated and operating solely as a nonprofit corporation under the laws of this state and qualified as a tax exempt organization under the Internal Revenue Service Code and having been continuously operating for a period of not less than one (1) year. The club shall have had during this one (1) year period a bona fide membership paying dues of at least twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per year as recorded by the secretary of the club, quarterly meetings and an actively engaged membership carrying out the objects of the club. A social club shall, upon applying for a license, file with the licensing authority and the division, a true copy of its bylaws and shall further, upon applying for a renewal of its license, file with the licensing authority and the division a detailed statement of its activities during the preceding year which were undertaken or furthered in pursuit of the objects of the club together with an itemized statement of amounts expended for such activities. Club members, at the time of application for a limited retail liquor license pursuant to W.S.

12-4-301

, shall be in good standing by having paid at least one (1) full year in dues;

Club does not mean college fraternities or labor unions;

A political subdivision of this state owning, maintaining or operating a bona fide golf course together with a clubhouse.

“Division” means the Wyoming liquor division within the department of revenue created under W.S.

12-2-106

;

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 92, § 3;

“Industry representative” means and includes all wholesalers, manufacturers, rectifiers, distillers and breweries dealing in alcoholic liquor or malt beverage, and proscriptions upon their conduct shall include conduct by a subsidiary, affiliate, officer, director, employee, agent, broker or any firm member of such entity;

“Intoxicating liquor”, “alcoholic liquor”, “alcoholic beverage” and “spirituous liquor” are construed as synonymous in meaning and definition;

“Licensee” means a person holding a:

Retail liquor license;

Limited retail liquor license;

Resort liquor license;

County retail malt beverage permit;

Twenty-four (24) hour malt beverage permit;

Restaurant liquor license;

Catering permit;

Bar and grill liquor license;

Malt beverage wholesale license;

Limited transportation liquor license;

Manufacturer’s license;

Manufacturer’s satellite permit;

Winery permit;

Winery satellite permit;

Out-of-state shipper’s license;

Microbrewery permit;

Malt beverage permit for the University of Wyoming;

Special malt beverage permit issued under W.S.

12-4-504

; or

Malt beverage permit for events conducted at rodeo arenas issued under W.S.

12-4-507

.

“Licensing authority” means the governing body of an incorporated city, town or county in Wyoming with the responsibility to issue, control and administer a particular license, or the division;

“Malt beverage” means any fluid, substance or compound intended for beverage purposes manufactured from malt, wholly or in part, or from any substitute therefor, containing at least one-half of one percent (.5%) of alcohol by volume;

“Original package” means any receptacle or container used or labeled by the manufacturer of the substance, containing any alcoholic liquors or malt beverages;

“Person” includes an individual person, partnership, corporation, limited liability company or any other association or entity, public or private;

“Resident” means a domiciled resident and citizen of Wyoming for a period of not less than one (1) year who has not claimed residency elsewhere for any purpose within a one (1) year period immediately preceding the date of application for any license or permit authorized under this title;

“Restaurant” means space in a building maintained, advertised and held out to the public as a place where individually priced meals are prepared and served primarily for on-premise consumption and where the primary source of revenue from the operation is from the sale of food and not from the sale of alcoholic or malt beverages;

Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 63, § 2.

“Sell” or “sale” includes offering for sale, trafficking in, bartering, delivering or dispensing and pouring for value, exchanging for goods, services or patronage or an exchange in any way other than purely gratuitously. Every delivery of any alcoholic liquor or malt beverage made otherwise than by gift constitutes a sale;

“Wholesaler” means any person except the division, who sells any alcoholic or malt beverage to a retailer for resale;

“Brewery” means a commercial enterprise at a single location producing more than fifty thousand (50,000) barrels per year of malt beverage;

“Microbrewery” means a commercial enterprise producing not more than fifty thousand (50,000) barrels per year and no less than fifty (50) barrels per year of malt beverage;

“Winery” means a commercial enterprise manufacturing wine at a single location in Wyoming;

“Operational” means offering for sale on an ongoing weekly basis to the general public alcoholic liquor and malt beverages as authorized under a license or permit issued under this title;

“Department” means the Wyoming department of revenue;

“Guest ranch” means a vacation resort offering accommodations for overnight stays and activities typical of western ranching;

Repealed by Laws 2020, ch. 87, § 3.

“Out-of-state shipper” means any licensee outside this state who accepts orders for manufactured wine placed from this state and who ships, packages for shipment or facilitates in any way shipment of the wine by a third party or common carrier to any person, household or licensed retailer in this state;

“Contract brewing” means a commercial arrangement in which a client brewer or microbrewer contracts with a brewery or microbrewery to produce malt beverage for the client brewer or microbrewer and where the contract brewery or microbrewery is entirely responsible for:

Producing the malt beverage;

Packaging the malt beverage;

Reporting and keeping appropriate brewery or microbrewery records, including crediting the malt beverage production toward the contract brewery’s or microbrewery’s production requirements for annual permit renewal;

Labeling the malt beverage with the contract brewery’s or microbrewery’s name and address;

Obtaining the necessary certificates of label approval;

Retaining ownership of the malt beverage until removal of the malt beverage from the contract brewing facility;

Obtaining any required territorial assignment;

Distributing the malt beverage back to the client brewer or microbrewer through a wholesaler;

Paying the appropriate rate of tax upon removal of the malt beverage from the contract brewing facility and reporting and remitting the tax to the appropriate tax authority.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 87, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 53-202; Laws 1949, ch. 136, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 12-2; Laws 1961, ch. 172, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

12-1-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1979, ch. 156, § 2; 1985, ch. 92, §§ 2, 3; 1988, ch. 44, § 1; 1992, ch. 74, § 2; 1996, ch. 74, § 2; ch. 122, § 2; 1997, ch. 115, § 1; ch. 191, § 1; 1999, ch. 21, § 1; ch. 61, § 1; 2001, ch. 84, § 2; ch. 103, § 1; 2006, ch. 106, § 2; 2009, ch. 42, § 1; 2010, ch. 82, § 1; 2015 ch. 48, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2016 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2016 ch. 86, § 2, effective March 4, 2016; 2017 ch. 63, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 162, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2020 ch. 87, §§ 1, 3, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 132, § 1, effective March 24, 2020; 2020 ch. 87, §§ 1, 3, effective July 1, 2020; 2020 ch. 153, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 22, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to prohibition against consumption or possession of alcoholic beverages in a motor vehicle, see §

31-5-235

.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, added (a)(viii)(H), and made related changes.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (a)(iii)(G).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “12-10-101” for “12-9-119” in (a)(xxiv).

The 2015 amendments. —

The first
2015 amendment, by ch. 48, § 1, effective July 1, 2015, in (a)(viii) and (a)(x), substituted “more than fifty thousand (50,000)” for “malt beverage in quantities to exceed fifteen thousand (15,000)”
and added “of malt beverage.”

The second 2015 amendment, by ch. 165, § 1, effective July 1, 2015, in (a)(xix), substituted “fifty (50)” for “one hundred (100).”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2016 amendments. —

The first 2016 amendment, by ch. 51 § 1, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “division” for “commission” in (a)(iii)(E), (iv), (ix), and (xvii).

The second 2016 amendment, by ch. 86 § 2,
substituted “12-10-102” for “12-10-101” in (a)(xxiv).

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 162, § 3, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(xxi) added “on an ongoing weekly basis,” deleted the end of the section text which formerly read: “for not less than three (3) consecutive months during any calendar year,” and made a related change.

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 63, § 2, effective July 1, 2017, repealed former (a)(xv), which read: ““Room” means an enclosed and partitioned space within a building large enough for a person to enter but not a cabinet. Partitions may contain windows and doorways, but any partition shall extend from floor to ceiling.”

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2020 amendments. —

The first 2020 amendment, by ch. 87, §§ 1, 3, effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(xix) substituted “no less than fifty” for “no less that fifty”; and repealed (a)(xxiv), which read “‘This title’ means W.S.

12-1-101

through

12-10-102

.”

The second 2020 amendment, by ch. 132, § 1, in (a)(xix) substituted “enterprise producing” for “enterprise at a single location producing.”

Laws 2020, ch. 132, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2020.

The third 2020 amendment, by ch. 153, § 1, effective July 1, 2020, added (a)(xxvi).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added "Twenty-four (24) hour" in (a)(viii)(E); added (a)(viii)(J) through (a)(viii)(U); deleted "The building shall have a dining room or rooms, a kitchen and the number and kinds of employees necessary for the preparing, cooking and serving of meals in order to satisfy the licensing authority that the space is intended for use as a full service restaurant. "Full service restaurant" means a restaurant at which waiters or waitresses deliver food and drink offered from a printed food menu to patrons at tables or booths. The service of only fry orders or such food and victuals as sandwiches, hamburgers or salads shall not be deemed a restaurant for the purposes of this section" in (a)(xiv); and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Internal Revenue Code. —

The federal Internal Revenue Code, referred to in the first sentence in subsection (a)(iii)(E), appears as 26 U.S.C. § 501 et seq.

Sale of Alcohol at In-Home Wine Tasting Events.—

Appellants
engaged in the sale of alcohol at in-home wine tasting events; appellants’
conduct qualified as a “sale” because they received
something of worth and utility in return for pouring wine, namely,
completed interest forms and contact information of guests who attend
the wine tasting events; Promotional, marketing, and educational activities
at the wine tasting events involved pouring alcohol, and when alcohol
was poured for value in combination with these activities, the statutory
definition was met. Phoenix Vintners, LLC v. Noble, 2018 WY 87, 423 P.3d 309,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 2018).

Laws circumscribe scope of license. —

The most that the Wyoming liquor licensing laws do is to circumscribe the scope and extent of the wholesale or retail license. Wyoming statutes require wholesaler and retailer as well to be limited to the wholesale and retail licenses, respectively. Lamp Liquors, Inc. v. Adolph Coors Co., 563 F.2d 425, 1977 U.S. App. LEXIS 11486 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1977).

No conflict between state law and federal antitrust law. —

The state has not really undertaken to regulate in the area of liquor traffic and, therefore, there can be no real conflict between the Wyoming statute and the federal anti-trust laws. They are reconcilable and can exist side by side. Lamp Liquors, Inc. v. Adolph Coors Co., 563 F.2d 425, 1977 U.S. App. LEXIS 11486 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1977).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Torts — Injuries Arising From Negligence in Furnishing Liquor to Minors and Intoxicated Adults: New Tort Action in Wyoming. McClellan v. Tottenhoff, 666 P.2d 408,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 341

(Wyo. 1983),” see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 285 (1984).

For article, "Regulating Liquor: Prohibition Enforcement, OfficialCorruption, and State Efforts to Control Alcohol After ProhibitionRepeal”,see 12 Wyo. L. Rev. 389 (2012).

§ 12-1-102.
Application of provisions.

The general control and regulatory provisions of this title apply to all licenses and permits authorized under this title, unless otherwise provided.

Nothing in this title prohibits a liquor supplier operating under a governmental permit or tax license from selling his product to the division or delivering products at points not within the state of Wyoming after licenses are secured as required by the division.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 87,§ 37; C.S. 1945, § 53-236; W.S. 1957, § 12-46; W.S. 1977, § 12-3-110; Laws 1978, ch. 51,§ 1; 1979, ch. 156, § 2; 2016 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, substituted “division” for “commission” in (b).